District of Columbia statutes.
19-1308.10

Recordkeeping and identification of trust property.

(a)

A trustee shall keep adequate records of the administration of the trust.

(b)

A trustee shall keep trust property separate from the trustee’s own property.

(c)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, a trustee shall cause the trust property to be designated so that the interest of the trust, to the extent feasible, appears in records maintained by a party other than a trustee or beneficiary.

(d)

If the trustee maintains records clearly indicating the respective interests, a trustee may invest as a whole the property of 2 or more separate trusts.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

History

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 810 of the Uniform Trust Code.

Editor's Notes